Utah statutes.
63M-8-204.   Election of chairman -- Meetings.
Commission members shall elect a chairman, and may appoint such other officers
from its membership as is deemed necessary.  The commission shall meet in
regular meetings and may meet at special meetings at the request of the
chairman or the governor.
